Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB646.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XVII-A.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE KSURVIVOR-CENTERED, ACCESSIBLE, FAIR ANDEMPOWERING HOUSING TRUST FUNDSection 1795-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Domestic violence program." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions). The term includes a culturally specific organization that has a substantive partnership with a domestic violence program."Fund." The Survivor-Centered, Accessible, Fair and Empowering Housing Trust Fund established under section 1796-A.1."Housing program." A project designed to provide emergency, transitional and permanent housing, along with related support services to facilitate movement toward living as independently as possible."Immediate family member." An adoptive child, biological 20250SB0646PN0658 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother or half sister currently living with a victim or survivor of domestic violence, sexual assault, dating violence, human trafficking or stalking."Rape crisis program." A nonprofit organization or program which has a primary purpose to provide confidential services to sexual violence victims, which include the following:(1) Survivor services, such as crisis intervention, crisis hotlines, counseling and therapy, legal and medical advocacy.(2) Community services, such as information and referrals, prevention education, community awareness, professional training and outreach and institutional advocacy in legal, medical, educational, housing and employment areas."Target population." Victims and survivors of domestic violence, sexual assault, dating violence, human trafficking and stalking and their immediate family members.Section 1796-A.1. Survivor-Centered, Accessible, Fair and Empowering Housing Trust Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Survivor-Centered, Accessible, Fair and Empowering Housing Trust Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(b) Purpose.--The fund is established for the following purposes:(1) To provide the target population with access to emergency, transitional and permanent housing programs in order to reduce homelessness and housing instability. Housing programs and services shall be available to the target population regardless of an individual's sex, gender identity or sexual orientation.20250SB0646PN0658 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) To promote a policy of housing as a right, rather than requiring survivors to demonstrate housing readiness as a prerequisite for obtaining permanent housing.Section 1797-A.1. Sources of revenue.(a) Transfer.--On the effective date of this subsection, the sum of $1,000,000 shall be transferred from the General Fund to the fund.(b) Additional surcharge.--(1) In addition to any fee, charge or cost authorized by law, an additional fee of $10 shall be charged and collected by the recorder of deeds and clerks of court or by any official designated to perform similar functions on each filing of a deed or mortgage.(2) All money received under paragraph (1) shall be transferred by the recorder of deeds and clerks of court collecting the fee to the State Treasurer for deposit into the fund.(c) Contributions.--(1) Within one year of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall provide for all of the following:(i) The ability of an individual renewing a driver's license or identification card electronically through the department's publicly accessible Internet website to make a contribution of $5 to the fund.(ii) The ability of a person renewing a vehicle registration electronically through the department's publicly accessible Internet website to make a contribution of $5 to the fund.(2) The contributions shall be implemented as follows:20250SB0646PN0658 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A contribution under paragraph (1) shall be added, as appropriate, to the regular fee for a renewal of a driver's license or identification card and a renewal of a vehicle registration.(ii) A contribution under paragraph (1) may be made for each renewal of a driver's license or identification card and each renewal of a vehicle registration.(3) Contributions under paragraph (1) shall be used exclusively for the purposes of the fund under section 1796-A.1(b).(4) The department shall determine on a monthly basis the total amount collected under this subsection and report that amount to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer that amount from the Motor License Fund to the fund.(5) The fund shall reimburse the Motor License Fund for the actual costs incurred by the department in the administration of paragraph (1).(6) The department shall provide adequate information concerning the contribution to the fund in the department's instructions for the renewal applicants under paragraph (1). The information shall include the listing of an address furnished by the agency to which contributions may be sent by individuals wishing to make additional contributions.(d) Other contributions.--Any grants, gifts, donations and other payments from an individual or government entity may be accepted as a contribution to the fund.Section 1798-A.1. Use of fund.(a) Authorization.--(1) The agency shall administer the fund and have the power to allocate revenue from the fund for any purpose 20250SB0646PN0658 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consistent with this subarticle.(2) The agency shall allocate revenue from the fund to reimburse the Motor License Fund as provided under section 1797-A.1(c)(5). (b) Grants.--(1) The agency shall allocate revenue from the fund to provide grants to domestic violence programs or rape crisis programs that operate housing programs for the target population. A domestic violence program or rape crisis program receiving a grant under this paragraph shall offer any of the following to the target population:(i) Affordable housing.(ii) Relocation services.(iii) Rent or rental subsidies.(iv) Stipends for security deposits, furniture and any other housing-related needs.(v) Financing options to facilitate homeownership.(vi) Any other service determined by the agency to provide housing options.(2) When allocating revenue from the fund under paragraph (1), the agency shall address and identify geographical areas where target populations have been underserved, disadvantaged and prevented from accessing safe, stable and permanent housing.(c) Operation.--(1) The agency shall adopt a statement of policy consistent with this subarticle within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph. The statement of policy shall be transmitted as a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the 20250SB0646PN0658 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Bulletin, but shall not be subject to review under any of the following:(i) Section 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(ii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iii) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) At a minimum, the statement of policy shall provide information on the maintenance of the fund, the criteria used by the agency to determine eligibility for the allocation of revenue from the fund and the procedures by which a program may request funding.(3) No less than once a year, the agency shall review the statement of policy.(4) The agency may solicit and accept gifts, donations, legacies and other revenues for deposit into the fund from any person or entity, including a government entity.(d) Report.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, and every year thereafter, the agency shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate. The report shall specify all of the following:(1) The revenues and expenditures of the fund in the prior fiscal year.20250SB0646PN0658 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The name of each program that has received money from the fund and the number of individuals assisted.(3) The number of individual grants awarded and the county of residence of the grantees.(4) A breakdown of total money spent by county, type of services provided and outcomes related to housing permanency. (e) Audit.--The Auditor General shall conduct an audit of the revenues and expenditures of the fund no later than three years after the effective date of this subsection. The Auditor General shall conduct subsequent audits of the revenues and expenditures of the fund no more than once every three years from the date of the preceding audit. The Auditor General shall submit a report of each audit to the Governor and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0646PN0658 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718